Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB158.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1371YC (4) 91 as/js H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 728.5A Minors present at drag 1 shows. 2 1. For purposes of this section, âdrag showâ means a 3 performance in which all of the following apply: 4 a. The main aspect of the performance is a performer 5 who exhibits a gender identity that is different than the 6 performerâs gender assigned at birth through the use of 7 clothing, makeup, accessories, or other gender signifiers. 8 b. The performer sings, lip-syncs, dances, reads, or 9 otherwise performs before an audience for entertainment, 10 whether or not performed for payment. 11 2. No minor shall be present at or view a drag show at a 12 place of business. 13 3. A person over eighteen years of age who knowingly brings 14 a minor to a drag show at a place of business shall be guilty 15 of a class âDâ felony. 16 4. A place of business that allows a minor to be present at 17 or view a drag show hosted by the place of business shall be 18 fined ten thousand dollars per minor for each violation of this 19 section. 20 5. An owner, manager, or person who exercises direct control 21 over a place of business who knowingly allows a minor to be 22 present at or view a drag show hosted by the place of business 23 shall be guilty of a class âDâ felony. 24 6. No state agency or public entity that receives state 25 funds shall use such funds to host a drag show. A state agency 26 or public entity committing a violation of this section shall 27 be fined ten thousand dollars per minor for each violation. 28 7. A parent or legal guardian of a minor may institute a 29 civil action for damages in the amount of not less than ten 30 thousand dollars and up to fifty thousand dollars for each 31 violation of this section. A court shall award the prevailing 32 party court costs and reasonable attorney fees. 33